Utah statutes.
31A-28-222.   Application of amendments.
(1)  The amendments in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 363, shall become effective
on April 30, 2001 and apply to the association's obligations under policies of
insolvent insurers as they exist on or after April 30,  2001.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the amendments to Subsections
31A-28-203(3) and 31A-28-207(1)(a) in Laws of Utah 2001, Chapter 363, that add
coverage for unearned premium claims shall apply only to insurers that become
insolvent after April 30, 2001.
